Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 3. Jails Generally

Cross references. —

For duty of county to provide a suitable jail, see §

18-2-103

.

For duty of sheriff as custodian of jail and prisoners, see §

18-3-603

.

For authority of county to issue bonds for the construction of a courthouse and jail, see §

18-4-302

.

For constitutional provision as to conduct of jails, see art. 1, § 16, Wyo. Const.

As to escape of prisoners generally, see §

6-5-201

et seq.

As to sentence, imprisonment, pardon and parole generally, see ch. 13 of title 7.

As to penal institutions generally, see title 25.

For duty of jailer as to prisoner convicted by court-martial, see §

19-12-106

.

As to public health and safety in relation to public institutions generally, see title 35.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of incarcerated mother to retain custody of infant in penal institution, 14 ALR4th 748.

Validity and construction of prison regulation of inmates' possession of personal property, 66 ALR4th 800.

Constitutional right of prisoners to abortion services and facilities—federal cases, 90 ALR Fed 683.

§ 18-6-301.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 122, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 2, related to the grand jury's duty to inspect jails and the commissioners duty to repair.

§ 18-6-302.
Jail to be kept by sheriff; manner in which prisoners to be kept.

The county sheriff or his deputy shall keep and maintain the jail in a safe and secure manner and is responsible for its operation.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 122, § 3.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 3; Laws 1879, ch. 49, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1368; R.S. 1899, § 1042; C.S. 1910, § 1086; C.S. 1920, § 1319; R.S. 1931, § 29-409; C.S. 1945, § 26-404; W.S. 1957, § 18-298; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1995, ch. 122, §§ 2, 3.

Cross references. —

For another provision as to duty of sheriff as custodian of jail and prisoners, see §

18-3-603

.

As to treatment of prisoners for venereal disease, see §

35-4-134

.

Stated

in

W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 18-6-303.
Care of prisoners; audit of expenses.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 122, § 3.

The sheriff shall arrange for the administration of medical care reasonably required by prisoners committed to his custody.

The county commissioners shall pay for reasonable and necessary medical care for:

Injuries incurred by a prisoner:

While in custody if the injuries are the proximate result of negligent or intentionally tortious acts committed by the sheriff or a member of his staff;

During an arrest by the sheriff or a member of his staff for commission of a crime, provided the injuries were not incurred while unlawfully resisting arrest;

While on work release or when performing duties assigned by the sheriff or a member of his staff.

Any infectious, contagious or communicable disease which the prisoner contracts while he is in custody; or

Medical examinations required by law or court order unless the order otherwise provides.

Unless indigent, a prisoner shall pay the cost of medical treatment for:

Injuries incurred by that prisoner:

While in custody if the injuries are not the proximate result of negligent or intentionally tortious acts committed by the sheriff or a member of his staff;

During the commission of a crime; and

While unlawfully resisting arrest or attempting to avoid an arrest.

Self-inflicted injuries;

Pre-custodial injuries or illness;

Pre-custodial dental conditions; and

Any other injuries not covered under subsection (c) of this section.

A health care provider furnishing treatment to a prisoner for which the prisoner is liable for payment shall attempt to collect the cost of the treatment from the prisoner or his insurance carrier. If the provider is unable to collect the cost after making reasonable efforts to secure collection, and the provider certifies by affidavit to the board of county commissioners that it is unable to collect the cost of medical treatment, the board of county commissioners, following payment, may initiate proceedings to collect from the prisoner any amounts so paid.

The sheriff may require a nonindigent prisoner to pay for any medical treatment under subsection (d) of this section, including any voluntary or involuntary mental health evaluation. Necessary medical treatment shall not be denied based upon a prisoner’s inability to pay.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 66, §§ 3, 6; Laws 1879, ch. 49, § 1; R.S. 1887, §§ 1368, 1371; R.S. 1899, §§ 1042, 1045; C.S. 1910, §§ 1086, 1089; C.S. 1920, §§ 1319, 1322; R.S. 1931, §§ 29-409, 29-412; C.S. 1945, §§ 26-404, 26-407; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-298, 18-299; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1986, ch. 29, § 1; 1991, ch. 216, § 1; 1995, ch. 122, §§ 2, 3.

“Necessary medical attendance” not emergency care only. —

The words “necessary medical attendance” are not ambiguous and do not mean emergency care only; the determination of what is “necessary medical attendance” is one of fact and may vary from case to case. Board of County Comm'rs v. Memorial Hosp., 682 P.2d 334,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1984) (decided prior to 1986 amendment).

Sheriff liable for neglect of inmates medical needs. —

Inmates were granted summary judgment in their Eighth and Fourteenth Amendment claims against county sheriff and county prison board. The sheriff was a policymaker under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 18-6-303(b) for whom municipal liability attached under 42 U.S.C.S. § 1983, and the facts established that the sheriff was deliberately indifferent to the inmates' serious medical needs where the inmates housed in the county jail faced an objectively intolerable risk of serious injury due to deficiencies in the jail's medical record-keeping system. Ginest v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 333 F. Supp. 2d 1190, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16956 (D. Wyo. 2004).

Quoted

in

Van Riper v. Odekoven, 2001 WY 58, 26 P.3d 325,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2001).

Stated

in

W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of prison authorities for injury to prisoner directly caused by assault by other prisoner, 41 ALR3d 1021.

Civil liability of prison or jail authorities for self-inflicted injury or death of prisoner, 79 ALR3d 1210.

§ 18-6-304.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 216, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 7, related to the sheriff inspecting and causing the jail to be clean.

§ 18-6-305.
Care of United States prisoners; disposition of monies collected.

Every sheriff or keeper of a jail to which any prisoner is committed by any marshal or other officer of the United States shall be responsible for the safekeeping of the prisoner according to the terms of the commitment. The money paid by the United States for the use of jails shall be credited to the general fund of the county wherein the jail is situated.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 10; R.S. 1887, § 1375; R.S. 1899, § 1049; C.S. 1910, § 1093; C.S. 1920, § 1326; R.S. 1931, § 29-414; C.S. 1945, § 26-409; W.S. 1957, § 18-301; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-6-306.
Care of prisoners arrested by state trooper and other special officers.

Every sheriff or keeper of any jail shall provide space if available for holding any persons arrested by a state trooper or other special officer of the state lawfully entitled to make arrests, prior to their trial and final commitment or release subject to the order of the court having jurisdiction.

Every sheriff or keeper of a jail to which any persons may be committed by any state trooper or other special officer of the state shall be responsible for the safekeeping of such persons according to the terms of such commitment.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-302; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1999, ch. 3, § 1.

§ 18-6-307.
Removal of prisoners in case of fire.

Whenever any jail is on fire or any building contiguous or near a jail is on fire and there is reason to believe that the prisoners confined in the jail may be injured or endangered, the sheriff or keeper of the jail may remove the prisoners to some safe and convenient place and confine them as long as necessary to avoid such danger, or if the jail is destroyed, until some other place is provided by the county commissioners for their safekeeping.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 1376; R.S. 1899, § 1050; C.S. 1910, § 1094; C.S. 1920, § 1327; R.S. 1931, § 29-415; C.S. 1945, § 26-410; W.S. 1957, § 18-303; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-6-308.
Sheriff and prisoners not subject to arrest when traveling.

Any sheriff or other officer who has arrested any prisoner may pass through any county that is in the ordinary route of travel from the place where the prisoner was arrested to the place where he is to be delivered. The prisoner and the officers having custody are immune from the service of civil process while passing through the county.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 1377; R.S. 1899, § 1051; C.S. 1910, § 1095; C.S. 1920, § 1328; R.S. 1931, § 29-416; C.S. 1945, § 26-411; W.S. 1957, § 18-304; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

§ 18-6-309.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 20, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 13, related to solitary confinement of prisoners.

§ 18-6-310.
Juvenile prisoners.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 98, § 2.

Juvenile prisoners shall be kept separate from adult prisoners.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 14; R.S. 1887, § 1379; R.S. 1899, § 1053; C.S. 1910, § 1097; C.S. 1920, § 1330; R.S. 1931, § 29-418; C.S. 1945, § 26-413; W.S. 1957, § 18-306; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1991, ch. 216, § 1; 1993, ch. 210, § 2; 1995, ch. 160, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203; 2012, ch. 98, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), deleted “Effective July 1, 1997” at the beginning of (b)..

The 2012 amendment,

repealed former (a), which read: “Subject to subsection (b) of this section, juvenile prisoners whenever practicable shall be kept separate from adult prisoners. Visits of parents shall be permitted at reasonable hours.”

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

§ 18-6-311.
Custody and safekeeping of documents relating to prisoners.

All instruments, writs, process of any kind, or attested copies thereof by which any prisoner is committed or released shall be endorsed and filed in some suitable place and all such documents shall be delivered to the successor of the officer having charge of the prisoner or succeeding to the office of sheriff.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1370; R.S. 1899, § 1044; C.S. 1910, § 1088; C.S. 1920, § 1321; R.S. 1931, § 29-411; C.S. 1945, § 26-406; W.S. 1957, § 18-307; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-6-312.
Jail register to be kept; information to be shown.

The sheriff or other officer performing the duties of sheriff shall maintain adequate records relating to the safety, health and welfare of all prisoners.

through (v) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 122, §§ 2, 3.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 15; R.S. 1887, § 1380; R.S. 1899, § 1054; C.S. 1910, § 1098; C.S. 1920, § 1331; R.S. 1931, § 29-419; C.S. 1945, § 26-414; W.S. 1957, § 18-308; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1995, ch. 122, §§ 2, 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 18-6-313.
Restrictions on jail expenses.

Nothing in W.S.

18-6-201

or

18-6-202

or

18-6-302

through

18-6-305

or

18-6-307

through

18-6-312

shall be construed as authorizing any board of county commissioners to give extra compensation to the county sheriff for performing the duties specified therein, or of incurring any expense on behalf of the county without the written authority of the board of county commissioners except as specifically provided.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 49, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1369; R.S. 1899, § 1043; C.S. 1910, § 1087; C.S. 1920, § 1320; R.S. 1931, § 29-410; C.S. 1945, § 26-405; W.S. 1957, § 18-297; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “18-6-302” for “18-6-301.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 18-6-314.
Contract placement of jail prisoners.

Subject to approval by the board of county commissioners and to the availability of funds, the sheriff may contract with a community correctional facility operated under the Adult Community Corrections Act for the housing of prisoners confined in the county jail in accordance with law for conviction of a misdemeanor. The contract shall ensure that the rights and privileges of prisoners housed in a community correctional facility under this section are not more restricted than those otherwise housed in the county jail.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 89, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the provisions relating to the Adult Community Corrections Act, see §§

7-18-101

and 7-18-102(a)(ix).

§ 18-6-315.
Prisoners not deemed to be in solitary confinement.

A prisoner shall not be considered to be held in solitary confinement solely because he is the only prisoner in the jail.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 20, § 1.

§ 18-6-316.
Contract for housing municipal prisoners.

Subject to approval by the board of county commissioners, the sheriff may contract with any municipality in Wyoming for the housing of prisoners charged or sentenced for municipal ordinance violations in the county jail.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 122, § 1.

§ 18-6-317.
Contract for housing out-of-state prisoners; general conditions.

Subject to approval by the board of county commissioners and the provisions of this section, the sheriff may contract with any other state or governmental entity within another state for the housing of prisoners in the county jail. The sheriff or keeper of a jail to which any out-of-state prisoner is housed shall be responsible for the safekeeping of the out-of-state prisoner according to the terms of the contract. Funds paid by any other state or governmental entity within another state for the use of a county jail shall be credited to the general fund of the county wherein the jail is situated.

A contract to house out-of-state prisoners shall:

Not impact the ability of the county to house county prisoners;

Not include housing prisoners who have been convicted of an offense which, if committed in Wyoming, could result in incarceration in a state penal institution;

Not require services be provided to prisoners under the contract which the jail does not currently provide;

Provide flexibility to the sheriff to reject or return prisoners to the state of origin if:

The jail has reached or is near capacity;

The sheriff determines that the prisoner is a security or safety risk to jail staff or other prisoners.

History.

2017 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 21, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.